Utah statutes.
32A-12-222.   Unlawful dispensing.
(1)  For purposes of this section:
(a)  "primary spirituous liquor" means the main distilled spirit in a
beverage; and
(b)  "primary spirituous liquor" does not include a secondary alcoholic
product used as a flavoring in conjunction with the primary distilled spirit
in the beverage.
(2)  A licensee licensed under this title to sell, serve, or otherwise furnish
spirituous liquor for consumption on the licensed premises, or an officer,
manager, employee, or agent of the licensee may not:
(a)  sell, serve, dispense, or otherwise furnish a primary spirituous liquor
to a person on the licensed premises except in a quantity that does not exceed
1.5 ounces per beverage dispensed through a calibrated metered dispensing
system approved by the department;
(b)  sell, serve, dispense, or otherwise furnish more than a total of 2.5
ounces of spirituous liquor per beverage;
(c)  allow a person on the licensed premises to have more than a total of 2.5
ounces of spirituous liquor at a time;
(d)  allow a person on the premises of the following to have more than one
spirituous liquor beverage at a time:
(i)  a restaurant liquor licensee;
(ii)  an on-premise banquet licensee;
(iii)  one of the following sublicenses of a resort license:
(A)  a restaurant sublicense; or
(B)  a limited restaurant sublicense; or
(iv)  a single event permittee; or
(e)  allow a person to have more than two spirituous liquor beverages at a
time in violation of:
(i)  Subsection 32A-4-206(2)(d);
(ii)  Subsection 32A-4a-305(10)(c)(ii); or
(iii)  Subsection 32A-5-107(7)(d).
(3)  A violation of this section is a class C misdemeanor.
